Utah statutes.
72-4-108.   State highways -- SR-21 to SR-26, SR-28 to SR-30.

State highways include:

(1)  SR-21.  From the Utah-Nevada state line near Garrison southerly and easterly to Beaver to Route 160.

(2)  SR-22.  From Antimony Bridge northerly to Route 62.

(3)  SR-23.  From Route 91 south of Wellsville northerly through Wellsville, Mendon, Petersboro, Newton, and Cornish to the Utah-Idaho state line near Weston, Idaho.

(4)  SR-24.  From Route 50 near Salina southerly through Loa to Hanksville; then northeasterly to Route 70 at Buckmaster Interchange west of Green River.

(5)  SR-25.  From Fish Lake Junction on Route 24 northerly to near Bowery Haven Campground.

(6)  SR-26.  From Route 126 in Roy easterly to Route 89 in Ogden.

(7)  SR-28.  From Route 89 in Gunnison northerly through Levan and Nephi to Route 15 north of Nephi.

(8)  SR-29.  From Joes Valley Reservoir easterly through Orangeville Junction to Route 10 north of Castle Dale.

(9)  SR-30.  From the Utah-Nevada state line northeasterly through Curlew Junction to Route 84 west of Snowville; then beginning again at a junction with Route 15 west of Riverside easterly through Collinston to Route 91 in Logan; then beginning again at a junction with Route 89 in Garden City southeasterly through Sage Creek Junction to the Utah-Wyoming state line.

